en: Tuna samosas
fr: Samoussas au thon, samossas au thon

en: Vegetable samosas
fr: Samoussas aux légumes, samossas aux légumes
hr: Samose od povrća
nl: Groentesamosa

en: Salty fritters
fi: Suolaiset uppopaistokset, Suolaiset fritit
fr: Beignets salés
hr: Slane popečke
it: Frittelle salate
nl: Hartige gefrituurde producten

en: Vegetable fritters
fr: Beignets de légumes

en: Bhaji, baji, bhajee
xx: Bhaji, baji, bhajee

en: Pakora
xx: Pakora

en: Sweet fritters
de: Süße Krapfen
fi: makeat fritit, Makeat uppopaistokset
fr: Beignets sucrés
hr: Slatke fritule
hu: Édes Fánkok
it: Frittelle dolci
nl: Zoete gefrituurde producten

en: Corn on the cob
fr: Maïs en épi
hr: Klip kukuruza
it: Pannocchie
nl: Maïskolven

en: Reheatable watercress soup
fr: Soupes au cresson à réchauffer

en: Dehydrated watercress soup
fr: Soupes au cresson déshydratée

en: Dehydrated and reconstituted watercress soup
fr: Soupe au cresson déshydratée reconstituée

en: Rasam
fr: Rasam

en: Toppings
de: Garnierungen
fi: päällysteet
fr: Nappages
hr: Nadjevima
nl: Garnering

en: Dehydrated Madeira wine aspic
fr: Gelée au madère déshydratée

en: Madeira wine aspic
fr: Gelée au madère

en: Aspic
fr: Aspic

en: Vegetable Aspic
fr: Aspic de légumes

en: Fish Aspic
fr: Aspic de poisson

en: Meat Aspic
fr: Aspic de viande

en: Frozen meals with fish
fr: Plats préparés au poisson surgelés